fr: Forme du fil dentaire: Ruban; Ruban; Autre
sv: Form på tandtråd: Band; Tejp; Övrigt
nl: Vorm flossdraad: Lint; Plakband; Andere
fi: Hammaslangan muoto: Nauha; Nauha; Muu
tr: Diş İplikleri şekli: Kurdele; Bant; Diğer
pt-BR: Formato de fio dental: Fita; Fita; Outro
hu: Fogselyem alakja: Szalag; Selyem; Egyéb
lt-LT: Dantų siūlo forma: Siūlas; Juostelė; Kita
en: Dental floss shape: Ribbon; Tape; Other
hr-HR: Oblik zubnog konca: Vrpca; Traka; Ostalo
el: Σχήμα οδοντικού νήματος: Κορδέλα; Ταινία; Άλλο
ro-RO: Formă ață dentară: Panglică; Bandă; Altele
ko: 치실 모양: 리본; 테이프; 기타
de: Zahnseide Form: Schleife; Band; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Tvar dentálnej nite: Stužka; Páska; Iné
bg-BG: Форма на конец за зъби: Панделка; Лента; Други
nb: Tanntrådform: Bånd; Teip; Annet
it: Forma del filo interdentale: Nastro; Nastro; Altro
es: Forma del hilo dental: Cinta; Cinta; Otros
vi: Hình chỉ nha khoa: Ruy-băng; Băng dính; Khác
ja: 歯のフロス形状: リボン; テープ; その他
da: Form på tandtråd: Bånd; Tape; Andet
pt-PT: Forma de fio dental: Fita; Fita adesiva; Outro
zh-CN: 牙线形状: 丝带; 胶带状; 其他
cs: Tvar zubní nitě: Páska; Páska; Jiné
sl-SI: Oblika zobne nitke: Nitka; Trak; Drugo
th: รูปทรงไหมขัดฟัน: ริบบิ้น; เทป; อื่นๆ
pl: Kształt nici dentystycznej: Wstążka; Taśma; Inne
zh-TW: 牙線形狀: 絲帶; 磁帶; 其他
ru: Форма зубной нити: Лента; Лента; Другое